Washington statutes.
RCW 26.60.080

Community property rights—Date of application.

Any community property rights of domestic partners established by chapter 6, Laws of 2008 shall apply from the date of the initial registration of the domestic partnership or June 12, 2008, whichever is later.

[ 2008 c 6 s 601.]